Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 5
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Section

23-5-101. Colorado educational institutions - annual reports. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 15:

p. 365, § 1.

C.L.

§ 320.

CSA:

C. 153, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 124-1-1.

L. 61:

pp. 708, 709, §§ 1, 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-1.

L. 64:

p. 170, § 134.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 743, § 1, effective June 16.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1094, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 376, § 1, effective March 30.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 833, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 769, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1154, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1796, § 8, effective May 31.

23-5-101.5. Enterprise status of auxiliary facilities - definitions.

Any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities with similar functions which is managed by the governing body of an institution of higher education or by the board of directors of the Auraria higher education center may be designated as an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as the governing body of the institution of higher education or the board of directors of the Auraria higher education center, whichever manages such auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities, retains the authority to issue revenue bonds on behalf of such auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities and such auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants from all Colorado state and local governments combined. The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, for the purposes of determining whether an auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities may be designated as an enterprise, it is sufficient that the governing body of an institution of higher education or the board of directors of the Auraria higher education center, whichever manages such auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities, has authority to issue revenue bonds on behalf of such auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities. So long as it is designated as an enterprise pursuant to the provisions of this section, an auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities shall not be subject to any of the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

(1.5) In pledging revenues for the repayment of revenue bonds issued on behalf of any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities that is designated as an enterprise, the institution of higher education and the auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities may pledge internal revenues only if the auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities:

Is accounted for separately in institutional financial records;

Is self-supporting from revenues received as gifts from nongovernmental sources or in exchange for goods and services; and

Engages in the type of activities that are commonly carried on for profit outside the public sector.

As used in this section and sections 23-5-101.7 to 23-5-105.5:

"Auxiliary facility" means any student or faculty housing facility; student or faculty dining facility; recreational facility; student activities facility; child care facility; continuing education facility or activity; intercollegiate athletic facility or activity; health facility; alternative or renewable energy producing facility, including but not limited to, a solar, wind, biomass, geothermal, or hydroelectric facility; college store; or student or faculty parking facility; or any similar facility or activity that has been historically managed, and was accounted for in institutional financial statements prepared for fiscal year 1991-92, as a self-supporting facility or activity, including any additions to and any extensions or replacements of any such facility on any campus under the control of the governing board managing such facility. "Auxiliary facility" shall also mean any activity undertaken by the governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education as an eligible lender participant pursuant to parts 1 and 2 of article 3.1 of this title.

"Grant" means any direct cash subsidy or other direct contribution of money from the state or any local government in Colorado which is not required to be repaid.

"Grant" does not include:

Any indirect benefit conferred upon an auxiliary facility, or group of auxiliary facilities or an institution or group of institutions from the state or any local government in Colorado, including any interest in or use of existing facilities owned, funded, or financed by the governing board of an institution, the state, or any local government in Colorado;

Any revenues resulting from market exchanges such as rates, fees, assessments, tuition, or other charges imposed by an auxiliary facility, or group of auxiliary facilities or by an institution or group of institutions for the provision of goods or services by such auxiliary facility, group of auxiliary facilities, institution or group of institutions, including services to the state or a local government in Colorado and fees paid to the auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities for internal services provided to the institution of higher education with which the auxiliary facility is associated;

Any federal funds, regardless of whether such federal funds pass through the state or any local government in Colorado prior to receipt by an auxiliary facility, group of auxiliary facilities, institution, or group of institutions;

Fees received by an institution pursuant to a fee-for-service contract between the department of higher education and the institution or the institution's governing board;

Revenues received by an institution or group of institutions that have been paid on behalf of an eligible undergraduate student from the college opportunity fund pursuant to article 18 of this title.

"Internal revenues" means revenues received in exchange for the provision of goods or services to the institution of higher education with which the auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities is associated; except that revenues received from another auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities that has been designated as an enterprise are not "internal revenues".

The governing body of an institution of higher education or the board of directors of the Auraria higher education center may, by resolution, designate any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities with similar functions managed by such governing body or board of directors, as applicable, as an enterprise so long as such auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities meets the requirements for an enterprise as stated in subsection (1) of this section. The designation of a group of auxiliary facilities with similar functions may include auxiliary facilities that are located at one or more campuses or institutions under the jurisdiction of the governing body or board of directors. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), any such designation of an auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities in accordance with the requirements of this paragraph (a) shall not terminate, expire, or be rescinded as long as the auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities meets the requirements for an enterprise.

All designations adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be submitted by the adopting body to the office of the state auditor in the form and manner prescribed by the legislative audit committee. Said designations shall be reviewed by said office to determine whether said designations are within the authority of the adopting body pursuant to the provisions of this section and for later review by the legislative audit committee for its opinion as to whether the designations conform with the provisions of this section. The official certificate of the state auditor as to the fact of submission or the date of submission of a designation as shown by the records of the office of the state auditor, as well as to the fact of nonsubmission as shown by the nonexistence of such records, shall be received and held in all civil cases as competent evidence of the facts contained therein. Any such designation adopted by a governing body of an institution of higher education or by the board of directors of the Auraria higher education center without being so submitted within twenty days after adoption to the office of the state auditor for review by said office and by the legislative audit committee shall be void. The findings of the office of the state auditor shall be presented to said committee at a public meeting held after timely notice to the public and affected adopting bodies. The legislative audit committee shall, on affirmative vote, submit such designations, comments, and any proposed legislation at the next regular session of the general assembly. Any member of the general assembly may introduce a bill which rescinds any designation. Rejection of such a bill does not constitute legislative approval of such designation. Each adopting body shall revise its designations to conform with the action taken by the general assembly. For the purpose of performing the functions assigned it by this paragraph (b), the legislative audit committee, with the approval of the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate, may appoint subcommittees from the membership of the general assembly.

The following auxiliary facilities are designated as enterprises in accordance with the requirements of this section:

Auraria higher education center:

Parking;

Student facilities;

Reprographics; and

Other auxiliaries;

and (VI) (Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1407, § 6, effective July 1, 1997.)

University of Colorado:

Auxiliary facilities;

Education services;

Research support services; and

Other self-funded services;

Colorado school of mines:

Student and faculty services;

Continuing education;

General operations; and

Research revolving;

University of northern Colorado:

Continuing education; and

to (IV) (Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 218, § 1, effective April 10, 1998.)

(V) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 110, § 1, effective March 17, 2004.)

(VI) Auxiliary facilities;

Colorado community college and occupational education system:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 218, § 1, effective April 10, 1998.)

Continuing education;

Student and faculty services;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1407, § 6, effective July 1, 1997.)

Tec operations; and

Lowry enterprise;

Colorado state university system:

Student and faculty operations and activities;

Continuing education;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1407, § 6, effective July 1, 1997.)

Research building revolving fund; and

Colorado state forest service seedling tree nursery;

Adams state university:

Student and faculty services; and

Continuing education;

Colorado Mesa university:

Student and faculty services;

Continuing education; and

Other self-funded services;

Metropolitan state university of Denver:

Student and faculty services; and

Continuing education;

Western Colorado university:

Student and faculty services; and

Continuing education; and

Fort Lewis college:

Student and faculty operations and activities; and

Continuing education.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section relating to the designation of auxiliary facilities as enterprises, those auxiliary facilities of Fort Lewis college, which were a part of the Colorado state university system enterprise pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (4) of this section, shall, as they relate to Fort Lewis college, be designated enterprises of the board of trustees for Fort Lewis college, established in section 23-52-102.

Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section relating to the designation of auxiliary facilities as enterprises:

Any auxiliary facilities of Adams state university that were a part of any state colleges enterprise pursuant to paragraph (g) of subsection (4) of this section in existence prior to the establishment of the board of trustees of Adams state university in section 23-51-102 shall, as they relate to Adams state university, be designated enterprises of the board of trustees of Adams state university.

Any auxiliary facilities of Colorado Mesa university that were part of Mesa state college that were a part of any state colleges enterprise pursuant to paragraph (g) of subsection (4) of this section in existence prior to the establishment of the board of trustees of Colorado Mesa university in section 23-53-102 shall, as they relate to Colorado Mesa university, be designated enterprises of the board of trustees of Colorado Mesa university.

Any auxiliary facilities of Metropolitan state university of Denver that were a part of any state colleges enterprise established under law in existence prior to the establishment of the board of trustees of Metropolitan state university of Denver in section 23-54-102 shall, as they relate to Metropolitan state university of Denver, be designated enterprises of the board of trustees of Metropolitan state university of Denver.

Any auxiliary facilities of Western Colorado university that were a part of any state colleges enterprise pursuant to subsection (4)(g) of this section in existence prior to the establishment of the board of trustees of Western Colorado university in section 23-56-102 shall, as they relate to Western Colorado university, be designated enterprises of the board of trustees of Western Colorado university.

Notwithstanding section 24-77-108, an auxiliary facility, or group of auxiliary facilities with similar functions, that is managed by the governing body of an institution of higher education or by the board of directors of the Auraria higher education center, that was designated as an enterprise as of January 1, 2021, and that subsequently disqualifies as an enterprise does not require voter approval in order to qualify and be redesignated as an enterprise.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1820, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(4) added, p. 624, § 1, effective April 14; (2)(a), (2)(b)(II)(B), and (3)(a) amended, p. 1677, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 97:

(1.5), (2)(c), and (4)(e)(VI) added and (4)(a)(III), (4)(a)(V), (4)(a)(VI), (4)(e)(IV), (4)(e)(V), (4)(f)(II), and (4)(f)(III) amended, p. 1407, §§ 4, 5, 6, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(4) amended, p. 218, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2002:

(2)(a) amended, p. 962, § 3, effective June 1; (4)(h) and (5) added, pp. 1260, 1261, §§ 19, 20, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(4)(g) amended, p. 789, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4)(d)(I), (4)(d)(V), (4)(g), and (4)(h) amended and (4)(i), (4)(j), (4)(k), and (6) added, pp. 110, 111, §§ 1, 2, effective March 17; (2)(b)(II) amended, p. 720, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3)(a) and (4) amended, (HB 09-1229), ch. 167, p. 734, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2010:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1859, § 41, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

IP(4)(h) and (6)(b) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1366, § 18, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(4)(g) and (6)(a) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 758, § 13, effective May 19; IP(4)(i) and (6)(c) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 425, § 9, effective July 1; IP(4)(j) and (6)(d) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1269, § 11, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

IP(4), IP(4)(j), IP(6), and (6)(d) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3545, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(7) added, (HB 22-1400), ch. 414, p. 2923, § 2, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsections (4)(h) and (5), see section 1 of chapter 303, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (2)(b)(II), see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2004. For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending subsection (2)(a), see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010. For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (4)(h) and subsection (6)(b), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011. For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (4)(i) and subsection (6)(c), see section 1 of chapter 125, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1400, see section 1 of chapter 414, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-5-101.7. Enterprise status of institutions of higher education.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "institution of higher education" or "institution" means the Colorado state university - Pueblo, Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, Metropolitan state university of Denver, Fort Lewis college, Western Colorado university, the university of northern Colorado, Colorado school of mines, the university of Colorado, Colorado state university, and all community colleges governed by the state board for community colleges and occupational education.

An institution of higher education, or a group of institutions of higher education that is managed by a single governing board, may be designated as an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as the governing board of the institution or group of institutions retains authority to issue revenue bonds on behalf of the institution or group of institutions and the institution or group of institutions receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it is designated as an enterprise pursuant to the provisions of this section, an institution or group of institutions shall not be subject to any of the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

In pledging revenues for the repayment of revenue bonds issued on behalf of an institution of higher education or group of institutions of higher education that is designated as an enterprise, the institution or group of institutions may pledge internal revenues only if the institution or group of institutions:

Is accounted for separately in institutional financial records; and

Engages in the type of activities that are commonly carried on for profit outside the public sector.

The governing board of an institution of higher education may, by resolution, designate an institution of higher education or group of institutions of higher education managed by the governing board as an enterprise so long as the institution or group of institutions meets the requirements for an enterprise stated in subsection (2) of this section. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), any such enterprise designation shall not terminate, expire, or be rescinded as long as the institution or group of institutions meets the requirements for an enterprise.

All resolutions adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be submitted by the adopting governing board to the office of the state auditor in the form and manner prescribed by the legislative audit committee. The designations shall be reviewed by the office of the state auditor to determine whether the designations are within the authority of the adopting governing board pursuant to the provisions of this section. The legislative audit committee shall also review the designations to determine whether the designations conform with the provisions of this section. The official certificate of the state auditor as to the fact of submission or the date of submission of a designation as shown by the records of the office of the state auditor, as well as to the fact of nonsubmission as shown by the nonexistence of such records, shall be received and held in all civil cases as competent evidence of the facts contained therein. A designation adopted by a governing board of an institution or group of institutions of higher education without being submitted within twenty days after adoption to the office of the state auditor for review by the office and by the legislative audit committee shall be void.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding section 24-77-108, an institution of higher education, or a group of institutions of higher education that is managed by a single governing board, that was designated as an enterprise as of January 1, 2021, and that subsequently disqualifies as an enterprise does not require voter approval in order to qualify and be redesignated as an enterprise.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 719, § 8, effective July 1; (5) repealed, p. 1936, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1366, § 19, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 758, § 14, effective May 19; (1) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 426, § 10, effective July 1; (1) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1270, § 12, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3545, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(6) added, (HB 22-1400), ch. 414, p. 2923, § 3, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 12-1080, Senate Bill 12-148, and House Bill 12-1331 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2004. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act repealing subsection (5), see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2004. For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011. For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 125, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1400, see section 1 of chapter 414, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-5-101.8. Enterprise status of institutions of higher education - loans - bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1932, § 2, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section

23-5-101.9

provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2007. (See L. 2004, p. 1935.)

23-5-101.9. Repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1935, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2007. (See L. 2004, p. 1935.)

23-5-102. Funding for auxiliary facilities - institutions of higher education - loans - bonds.

For the purpose of obtaining funds for constructing, otherwise acquiring, and equipping auxiliary facilities for the use of students and employees at any state educational institution or any branch thereof or facilities for use by any institution or group of institutions that is designated as an enterprise pursuant to section 23-5-101.7 and for the acquisition of land for such purposes, the governing board of any state educational institution is authorized, after notification to the commission on higher education, to enter into contracts with any person, corporation, or state or federal government agency for the advancement of money for such purposes and providing for the repayment of such advancements with interest at a specified net effective interest rate.

The governing board of any institution of higher education by resolution may issue revenue bonds on behalf of any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities or on behalf of any institution or group of institutions managed by such governing board for the purpose of obtaining funds for constructing, otherwise acquiring, equipping, or operating such auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities or for facilities for such institution or group of institutions. Any bonds issued on behalf of any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities, other than housing facilities, dining facilities, recreational facilities, health facilities, parking facilities, alternative or renewable energy producing facilities including but not limited to, solar, wind, biomass, geothermal, or hydroelectric facilities, research facilities that are funded from a revolving fund, or designated enterprise auxiliary facilities listed in section 23-5-101.5 (4) may be issued only after approval by both houses of the general assembly either by bill or by joint resolution and after approval by the governor in accordance with section 39 of article V of the state constitution. The governing board of an institution or group of institutions that issues bonds on behalf of the institution or group of institutions, which is designated as an enterprise pursuant to section 23-5-101.7, shall file notice of such issuance with the Colorado commission on higher education. Bonds issued pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be payable only from revenues generated by the auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities or by the institution or group of institutions on behalf of which such bonds are issued; except that, subject to section 23-5-119.5 (5)(a)(III) and (5)(b)(II), revenues generated by a designated enterprise that is associated with the university of Colorado may be pledged for the repayment of bonds issued by another designated enterprise auxiliary facility that is not part of the same enterprise. Such bonds shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 23-5-103 (2). The termination, rescission, or expiration of the enterprise designation of any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities pursuant to section 23-5-101.5 (3) or of any institution or group of institutions shall not adversely affect the validity of or security for any revenue bonds issued on behalf of any auxiliary facility or group of auxiliary facilities or on behalf of any institution or group of institutions.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 554, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 124-1-6.

L. 61:

p. 710, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-4.

L. 67:

p. 201, § 1.

L. 70:

p. 345, § 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1822, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1678, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1405, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 721, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1860, § 42, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1418, § 8, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2004. For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-5-103. Pledge of income.

The governing board of any one or more state educational institutions, including but not limited to the state colleges under the control and operation of their respective boards of trustees, that enters into a contract for the advancement of money is authorized, in connection with or as a part of the contract, to pledge the net income derived or to be derived from land or facilities constructed, acquired, and equipped as security for the repayment of the money advanced in the contract, together with interest, and for the establishment and maintenance of reserves in connection with the contract. For the same purpose, any such governing board is also authorized, subject to the limitations specified in section 23-5-119.5 (5), to pledge the net income derived or to be derived from other facilities that are included in a designated enterprise or, if not included, other facilities that are not acquired and not to be acquired with money appropriated to the institution by the state of Colorado, and to pledge the net income, fees, and revenues derived from such sources, if unpledged, or, if pledged, the net income, fees, and revenues currently in excess of the amount required to meet principal, interest, and reserve requirements in connection with outstanding obligations to which the net income, fees, and revenues have been pledged. A governing board of an institution or group of institutions designated as an enterprise pursuant to section 23-5-101.7 that has entered into a contract for the advancement of money on behalf of the institution or group of institutions may pledge up to one hundred percent of tuition revenues of the enterprise, except for general fund money appropriated by the general assembly, and all or a portion of a facility construction fee that may be imposed as security for the repayment of the money advanced pursuant to the contract. The pledge of tuition revenues or the imposition of a facility construction fee includes a process for student input consistent with the institutional plan for student fees adopted by the governing board of the applicable institution pursuant to section 23-5-119.5.

Any advancement of moneys may be evidenced by interim warrants, if necessary, and bonds to be executed by and on behalf of the educational institution receiving the advancement and containing such terms and provisions, including provisions for redemption prior to maturity, as may be determined by the governing board of such institution. Such warrants or bonds may, at the discretion of the governing board, be registerable as to principal or interest, or both, and shall never be sold at less than ninety-five percent of the principal amount thereof and accrued interest thereon to the date of delivery nor at a price which will result in a net effective interest rate which exceeds that specified in the contract for the advancement of moneys. Any of the warrants or bonds of the institution issued pursuant to this article or any other law may be refunded pursuant to article 54 of title 11, C.R.S., if in the judgment of the governing board such refunding is to the best interests of the educational institution. Such refunding obligations may be made payable from any source which may be legally pledged for the payment of the obligations being refunded at the time of the issuance of the obligations so refunded or from any of the sources described in subsection (1) of this section, notwithstanding the pledge for the payment of the outstanding obligations being refunded is thereby modified.

If the pledged net income, fees, and revenues exceed the amount required to meet principal, interest, and reserve requirements in connection with revenue bonds of the institution to which such income has been pledged and exceed the amount necessary for the maintenance and operation of the auxiliary facility plus any amount set aside in a reserve fund for repair and replacement of the facility, the governing board may retain such surplus and utilize the same in such manner as in its judgment is for the best interests of the educational institution; except that, if the governing board uses the surplus moneys on a project expected to be paid from cash funds or other nonstate moneys, the project shall be subject to the provisions of section 23-1-106. Use of such surplus shall be reviewed in advance by representatives of the student government at the institution with which the auxiliary facility is associated.

Anticipation warrants or bonds issued pursuant to this article may be used as security for any depository bond or obligation where any kind of bonds or other securities shall or may by law be deposited as security.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 554, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 124-1-7.

L. 61:

p. 710, § 2.

L. 63:

p. 867, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-5.

L. 67:

p. 201, § 2.

L. 68:

p. 7, § 1.

L. 70:

p. 345, § 2.

L. 78:

(1) amended, p. 380, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 858, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1823, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1680, § 6, effective May 31.

L. 97:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1406, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 789, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 722, § 11, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1935, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, pp. 1419, 1431, §§ 9, 31, effective August 10.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-121), ch. 56, p. 135, § 1, effective March 31; (3) amended, (HB 16-1459), ch. 317, p. 1281, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-121), ch. 76, p. 385, § 1, effective April 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2004. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

23-5-104. No property lien.

The governing board of any state educational institution shall not create a mortgage upon any property belonging to the institution, nor shall the state be obligated, for the purpose of securing the repayment of any funds advanced pursuant to the provisions of sections 23-5-102 to 23-5-105 or the interest on such funds.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 555, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 124-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-6.

23-5-105. Tax exemption.

Any bonds, certificates, or warrants issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 23-5-102 to 23-5-105 by the governing board of any state educational institution shall be exempt from taxation for any state, county, school district, special district, municipal, or other purpose in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 555, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 124-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-7.

23-5-105.5. State board for community colleges and occupational education - authority to create financial obligations.

Nothing in sections 23-5-101.5 to 23-5-105 shall be construed to prohibit the state board for community colleges and occupational education from issuing revenue bonds or other revenue obligations payable from the revenues from all or any part of the auxiliary facilities within the community college and occupational education system.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 940, § 1, effective April 28.

23-5-106. Authority of governing boards - general - health-care insurance - contracts of indemnity.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education has the authority to promulgate rules and regulations for the safety and welfare of students, employees, and property, to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the governance of the respective institutions, and to promulgate rules and regulations deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 23-5-106 to 23-5-110. Western Colorado university shall not refuse to admit any Colorado resident qualified in accordance with applicable Colorado commission on higher education admission standards.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education shall not promulgate any rules or regulations that restrict or prohibit on-campus recruiting by any local, state, or federal governmental agency; except that recruiting activities by any local, state, or federal governmental agency shall be subject to the same time, place, or manner restrictions that apply to other entities that conduct recruiting on campus.

If a governing board of an institution of higher education requires a student to purchase health-care insurance, the board must allow the same exemption for those participating in a health care sharing ministry as specified in the federal "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act".

The governing board of a state institution of higher education that is designated as an enterprise pursuant to section 23-5-101.7 may contract to indemnify and hold harmless a contractor if the governing board determines that the contract serves a valid public purpose and any risks to the institution that may arise from entering into the contract are sufficiently limited and outweighed by the benefits of the contract. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a liability claim or expense that arises from a contract to indemnify or hold harmless entered into by a governing board pursuant to this subsection (4) shall not be payable from the risk management fund created in section 24-30-1510, C.R.S., and shall be payable solely from revenues of the institution.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 1063, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-8.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1677, § 2, effective May 31; entire section amended, p. 1796, § 9, effective May 31.

L. 2007:

(3)(a) amended, p. 69, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 2011:

(4) added, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1420, § 11, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1270, § 13, effective August 1.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1315), ch. 322, p. 1741, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3546, § 13, effective July 1.